Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB944.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1329(b)(3) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1329. Valuation of acquired water and wastewater systems.* * *(b) Utility valuation experts.--* * *(3) Fees paid to utility valuation experts may be included in the transaction and closing costs associated with acquisition by the acquiring utility or entity. Fees eligible for inclusion [may be of an amount not exceeding 5% of the fair market value of the selling utility or a fee approved by the commission.] shall be based upon an hourly rate deemed reasonable by the commission. A utility valuation expert 12345678910111213141516171819 shall submit supporting documentation to the commission for each hour billed in a form determined by the commission. The total fees due and the supporting documentation shall be subject to review and approval of the commission prior to disbursal of the fees to a utility valuation expert. The total billed amount by a utility valuation expert shall not exceed 5% of the fair market value of the selling utility.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0944PN1011 - 2 - 123456789